District of Columbia statutes.
3-407

Terms and conditions of apprenticeship.

(a)

In order to qualify for a funeral director’s license, an apprentice funeral director (“apprentice”) must serve an apprenticeship under the supervision of a funeral director licensed by the District.

(b)

Notwithstanding the requirement of subsection (a) of this section, an apprentice who is required to serve a 2-year minimum apprenticeship may serve up to 1 year of the apprenticeship outside of the District, if the period of apprenticeship served outside of the District is served under the supervision of a funeral director who has passed a nationally approved examination and is the owner or full-time employee of the funeral services establishment where the apprentice is employed. The Mayor shall issue rules and regulations to implement this subsection pursuant to § 3-420.

(c)

An apprentice funeral director may obtain license renewals allowing him to extend his apprenticeship, but the total period of apprenticeship shall not exceed 4 years.

(d)

Every apprentice employed in that capacity within the District shall, within 5 days after terminating his or her employment, notify the Mayor of the termination, indicating the date on which the employment ceased.

(e)

Every apprentice whose employment under the supervision of a funeral director is terminated shall, immediately upon being employed to work under the supervision of another funeral director, notify the Mayor of the change of employment, indicating the name, address, and license number of the funeral director under whose supervision the apprentice is continuing his or her apprenticeship.

(f)

A funeral director shall, upon employing an apprentice or terminating the employment of an apprentice, notify the Mayor in writing accordingly. The notification shall contain the name, address, and license number of the apprentice, as well as the date on which the apprentice was employed or terminated.

May 22, 1984, D.C. Law 5-84, § 8, 31 DCR 1815
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 186(c), 56 DCR 1117

History

1981 Ed., § 2-2807.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 17-353, in subsec. (b), substituted “§ 3-420” for “§ 3-403(i)”.

Effect of Amendments